Utah statutes.
53B-8-102.   Definition of resident student -- Exceptions.

(1)  As used in this section, "parent" means a student's biological or adoptive parent.

(2)  The meaning of "resident student" is determined by reference to the general law on the subject of domicile, except as provided in this section.

(3) (a)  Institutions within the state system of higher education may grant resident student status to any student who has come to Utah and established residency for the purpose of attending an institution of higher education, and who, prior to registration as a resident student:

(i)  has maintained continuous Utah residency status for one full year;

(ii)  has signed a written declaration that the student has relinquished residency in any other state; and

(iii)  has submitted objective evidence that the student has taken overt steps to establish permanent residency in Utah and that the student does not maintain a residence elsewhere.

(b)  Evidence to satisfy the requirements under Subsection (3)(a)(iii) includes:

(i)  a Utah high school transcript issued in the past year confirming attendance at a Utah high school in the past 12 months;

(ii)  a Utah voter registration dated a reasonable period prior to application;

(iii)  a Utah driver license or identification card with an original date of issue or a renewal date several months prior to application;

(iv)  a Utah vehicle registration dated a reasonable period prior to application;

(v)  evidence of employment in Utah for a reasonable period prior to application;

(vi)  proof of payment of Utah resident income taxes for the previous year;

(vii)  a rental agreement showing the student's name and Utah address for at least 12 months prior to application; and

(viii)  utility bills showing the student's name and Utah address for at least 12 months prior to application.

(c)  A student who is claimed as a dependent on the tax returns of a person who is not a resident of Utah is not eligible to apply for resident student status.

(4)  Except as provided in Subsection (8), an institution within the state system of higher education may establish stricter criteria for determining resident student status.

(5)  If an institution does not have a minimum credit-hour requirement, that institution shall honor the decision of another institution within the state system of higher education to grant a student resident student status, unless:

(a)  the student obtained resident student status under false pretenses; or

(b)  the facts existing at the time of the granting of resident student status have changed.

(6)  Within the limits established in Title 53B, Chapter 8, Tuition Waiver and Scholarships, each institution within the state system of higher education may, regardless of its policy on obtaining resident student status, waive nonresident tuition either in whole or in part, but not other fees.

(7)  In addition to the waivers of nonresident tuition under Subsection (6), each institution may, as athletic scholarships, grant full waiver of fees and nonresident tuition, up to the maximum number allowed by the appropriate athletic conference as recommended by the president of each institution.

(8)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3):

(a)  Personnel of the United States Armed Forces assigned to active duty in Utah or members of a reserve component of the United States Armed Forces assigned to Utah, and the immediate members of their families residing with them in this state are entitled to resident student status for tuition purposes.

(b)  Military personnel who had Utah residency immediately prior to their active duty status or reserve assignment and who reestablish residency in Utah upon the termination of active duty status or reserve assignment are entitled to resident student status for themselves and the immediate members of their families residing with them for tuition purposes.

(c)  An institution within the state system of higher education shall grant resident student status for tuition purposes to a child of a United States military person assigned to active duty if the child produces:

(i)  one of the following:

(A)  the military parent's United States active duty military identification card;

(B)  the child's United States active duty military identification and privilege card; or

(C)  a statement from the military parent's current company commander stating that the military parent is on active duty; and

(ii)  the military parent's state of legal residence certificate with Utah listed as the military parent's home of record.

(d)  An institution within the state system of higher education shall grant resident student status for tuition purposes to a military veteran and the military veteran's immediate family members who reside in the state if the military veteran provides:

(i)  evidence of a discharge from the United States Armed Forces, other than a dishonorable discharge, that occurred in the previous 12 months;

(ii)  a signed written declaration that the military veteran has relinquished residency in any other state and does not maintain a residence elsewhere; and

(iii)  objective evidence that the military veteran has taken overt steps to relinquish residency in any other state and establish residency in Utah, which may include evidence of the following:

(A)  a Utah voter registration card;

(B)  a Utah driver license or identification card;

(C)  a Utah vehicle registration;

(D)  evidence of employment in Utah;

(E)  a rental agreement showing name and Utah address; and

(F)  utility bills showing name and Utah address.

(9) (a)  Aliens who are present in the United States on visitor, student, or other visas which authorize only temporary presence in this country, do not have the capacity to intend to reside in Utah for an indefinite period and therefore are classified as nonresidents.

(b)  Aliens who have been granted immigrant or permanent resident status in the United States are classified for purposes of resident student status according to the same criteria applicable to citizens.

(10)  Any American Indian who is enrolled on the tribal rolls of a tribe whose reservation or trust lands lie partly or wholly within Utah or whose border is at any point contiguous with the border of Utah, and any American Indian who is a member of a federally recognized or known Utah tribe and who has graduated from a high school in Utah, is entitled to resident student status.

(11)  A Job Corps student is entitled to resident student status if the student:

(a)  is admitted as a full-time, part-time, or summer school student in a program of study leading to a degree or certificate; and

(b)  submits verification that the student is a current Job Corps student.

(12) (a)  A member of the Utah National Guard is entitled to resident student status if the student:

(i)  is admitted as a full-time, part-time, or summer school student in a program of study leading to a degree or certificate; and

(ii)  submits verification that the student is a member of the Utah National Guard.

(b)  A member of the Utah National Guard who performs active duty service shall be considered to maintain continuous Utah residency under this section.

(13)  A person is entitled to resident student status and may immediately apply for resident student status if the person:

(a)  marries a Utah resident eligible to be a resident student under this section; and

(b)  establishes his or her domicile in Utah as demonstrated by objective evidence as provided in Subsection (3).

(14)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(c), a dependent student who has at least one parent who has been domiciled in Utah for at least 12 months prior to the student's application is entitled to resident student status.

(15) (a)  A person who has established domicile in Utah for full-time permanent employment may rebut the presumption of a nonresident classification by providing substantial evidence that the reason for the individual's move to Utah was, in good faith, based on an employer requested transfer to Utah, recruitment by a Utah employer, or a comparable work-related move for full-time permanent employment in Utah.

(b)  All relevant evidence concerning the motivation for the move shall be considered, including:

(i)  the person's employment and educational history;

(ii)  the dates when Utah employment was first considered, offered, and accepted;

(iii)  when the person moved to Utah;

(iv)  the dates when the person applied for admission, was admitted, and was enrolled as a postsecondary student;

(v)  whether the person applied for admission to an institution of higher education sooner than four months from the date of moving to Utah;

(vi)  evidence that the person is an independent person who is:

(A)  at least 24 years of age; or

(B)  not claimed as a dependent on someone else's tax returns; and

(vii)  any other factors related to abandonment of a former domicile and establishment of a new domicile in Utah for purposes other than to attend an institution of higher education.

(16) (a)  A person who is in residence in Utah to participate in a United States Olympic athlete training program, at a facility in Utah, approved by the governing body for the athlete's Olympic sport, shall be entitled to resident status for tuition purposes.

(b)  Upon the termination of the athlete's participation in the training program, the athlete shall be subject to the same residency standards applicable to other persons under this section.

(c)  Time spent domiciled in Utah during the Olympic athlete training program in Utah counts for Utah residency for tuition purposes upon termination of the athlete's participation in a Utah Olympic athlete training program.

(17) (a)  A person who has established domicile in Utah for reasons related to divorce, the death of a spouse, or long-term health care responsibilities for an immediate family member, including the person's spouse, parent, sibling, or child, may rebut the presumption of a nonresident classification by providing substantial evidence that the reason for the individual's move to Utah was, in good faith, based on the long-term health care responsibilities.

(b)  All relevant evidence concerning the motivation for the move shall be considered, including:

(i)  the person's employment and educational history;

(ii)  the dates when the long-term health care responsibilities in Utah were first considered, offered, and accepted;

(iii)  when the person moved to Utah;

(iv)  the dates when the person applied for admission, was admitted, and was enrolled as a postsecondary student;

(v)  whether the person applied for admission to an institution of higher education sooner than four months from the date of moving to Utah;

(vi)  evidence that the person is an independent person who is:

(A)  at least 24 years of age; or

(B)  not claimed as a dependent on someone else's tax returns; and

(vii)  any other factors related to abandonment of a former domicile and establishment of a new domicile in Utah for purposes other than to attend an institution of higher education.

(18)  The board, after consultation with the institutions, shall make rules not inconsistent with this section:

(a)  concerning the definition of resident and nonresident students;

(b)  establishing procedures for classifying and reclassifying students;

(c)  establishing criteria for determining and judging claims of residency or domicile;

(d)  establishing appeals procedures; and

(e)  other matters related to this section.

(19)  A student shall be exempt from paying the nonresident portion of total tuition if the student:

(a)  is a foreign national legally admitted to the Unites States;

(b)  attended high school in this state for three or more years; and

(c)  graduated from a high school in this state or received the equivalent of a high school diploma in this state.



Amended by Chapter 275, 2012 General Session

